Missouri, session 2026, HB2722.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.2542, to read as follows:
173.2542. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Success for
Homeless and Foster Youth in Higher Education Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Foster youth", any individual in the care, custody, or guardianship of the
children's division of the department of social services in the foster care program for
any six of the seventy-two months immediately prior to such individual's eighteenth
birthday;
(2) "Homeless youth", any individuals who are:
(a) Included within the definition of the term "homeless children and youths" in
42 U.S.C. Section 11434a(2); or
(b) Included within the definition of the term "unaccompanied youth" in 42
U.S.C. Section 11434a(6);
(3) "Liaison", a designated staff member of an institution of higher education
who is knowledgeable in the issues and laws relating to homeless youth and foster youth
including, but not limited to, the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, 42
U.S.C. Section 11431 et seq.
3. Each public institution of higher education shall, and each private institution
of higher education may, designate a homeless and foster student liaison within such
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2722 2
institution's financial aid office. The liaison shall be responsible for applying the
provisions of the federal Higher Education Act as set forth in 20 U.S.C. Section 1070 et
seq., pertaining to the independent student status and financial aid eligibility of current
and former homeless youth and foster youth, and shall assist these students, both
current and prospective, in applying for federal and state financial aid and other
assistance for which they may be eligible.
4. A public or private institution of higher education may grant resident status to
a student who resides in this state and is under twenty years of age at the time of
enrollment, regardless of how long such student has resided in this state, if such student
is determined to have been homeless at any time during the two years immediately
preceding such student's enrollment and is not prohibited from receiving a
postsecondary education public benefit under section 173.1110.
5. In order to ensure that current and former homeless youth and foster youth
have access to stable housing, a public or private institution of higher education that
offers student housing may develop a plan to assist students who are homeless youth or
foster youth in navigating the financial aid award package and housing options to
maximize access to housing resources as needed during and between academic terms.
The plan may grant such students first priority for housing placement and provide that
they be placed in the institution's housing facility that remains open for occupation
during the most days in a calendar year.
6. The department of higher education and workforce development shall create
and publish a searchable directory of homeless and foster student liaisons designated by
public institutions of higher education under this section. Such directory shall be
accessible to the public and shall be updated annually by the department. A private
institution of higher education that designates a homeless and foster student liaison may
provide information to the department for inclusion in the directory.
✔